fi: Trukin profiili: Korkea; Matala; Keskikorkea; Muu
pl: Profil trucka: Wysoki; Niski; Średni; Inne
sv: Lastbilsprofil: Hög; Låg; Mellan; Annat
th: รายละเอียดรถบรรทุก: สูง; ต่ำ; ปานกลาง; อื่นๆ
tr: Kamyon profili: Yüksek; Düşük; Orta; Diğer
bg-BG: Профил на скейтборд осите: Висок; Нисък; Среден; Друг
vi: Hồ sơ xe tải: Cao; Thấp; Vừa; Khác
zh-TW: 輪架輪廓: 高; 低; 中; 其他
da: Truckprofil: Høj; Lav; Mellem; Andet
sk-SK: Profil nákladného vozidla: Vysoký; Nízky; Stredný; Iný
nl: Truck profiel: Hoog; Laag; Mid; Anders
cs: Profil trucku: Vysoký; Nízký; Střední; Ostatní
pt-PT: Perfil dos eixos: Alto; Baixo; Médio; Outro
it: Profilo del truck: Alto; Basso; Medio; Altro
sl-SI: Profil tovornjaka: Visok; Nizek; Srednji; Drugo
ja: トラックプロファイル: ハイ; ロー; ミッド; その他
ko: 트럭 높이 유형: 하이; 로우; 미드; 기타
lt-LT: Sunkvežimio profilis: Aukštas; Žemas; Vidutinis; Kita
ru: Профиль траков: Высокий; Низкий; Средний; Другое
hu: Teherautó profilja: Magas; Alacsony; Közepes; Egyéb
nb: Lastebilprofil: Høy; Lav; Middels; Annet
el: Προφίλ άξονα: Ψηλό; Χαμηλό; Μεσαίο; Άλλο
fr: Profil du truck: Haut; Bas; Moyen; Autre
hr-HR: Profil kamiona: Visoko; Nisko; Srednje; Ostalo
zh-CN: 桥架高度类型: 高; 低; 中; 其他
es: Perfil del camión: Alto; Bajo; Medio; Otro
de: Achsprofil: High; Low; Mid; Sonstiges
en: Truck profile: High; Low; Mid; Other
pt-BR: Truck perfil: Alto; Baixo; Médio; Outro
ro-RO: Profilul camionului: Înalt; Jos; Mediu; Altele